Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.291

Waiver—Application by escrow license applicant.

Nothing in RCW 18.44.201, 18.44.241 through 18.44.261, 18.44.271, and 18.44.281 shall be construed as prohibiting a person applying for an escrow license from applying for a certificate of waiver of the errors and omissions policy requirement when seeking an escrow license.

[ 2000 c 171 s 16; 1987 c 471 s 9. Formerly RCW 18.44.398.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1987 c 471: See notes following RCW 18.44.231.